Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3173
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Adoption Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2025, LB647, § 9.